Utah statutes.
67-16-15.   Complaint -- Political Subdivisions Ethics Review Commission.

A person may file a complaint for an alleged violation of this chapter by a political subdivision officer or employee in accordance with Title 11, Chapter 49, Political Subdivisions Ethics Review Commission.

